Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.250

Transcript accorded verity.

The report of the official reporter employed by the court or other certified court reporter, or authorized transcriptionist, when transcribed and certified as being a correct transcript of the stenographic notes or electronically recorded testimony, or other oral proceedings had in the matter, shall be prima facie a correct statement of such testimony or other oral proceedings had, and the same may thereafter, in any civil cause, be read in evidence as competent testimony, when satisfactory proof is offered to the judge presiding that the witness originally giving such testimony is then dead or without the jurisdiction of the court, subject, however, to all objections the same as though such witness were present and giving such testimony in person.

[ 2016 c 74 s 2; 1913 c 126 s 6; RRS s 42-6.]